Utah statutes.
13-11-4.   Deceptive act or practice by supplier.
(1)  A deceptive act or practice by a supplier in connection with a consumer
transaction violates this chapter whether it occurs before, during, or after
the transaction.
(2)  Without limiting the scope of Subsection (1), a supplier commits a
deceptive act or practice if the supplier knowingly or intentionally:
(a)  indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction has sponsorship,
approval, performance characteristics, accessories, uses, or benefits, if it
has not;
(b)  indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular
standard, quality, grade, style, or model, if it is not;
(c)  indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction is new, or unused,
if it is not, or has been used to an extent that is materially different from
the fact;
(d)  indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction is available to the
consumer for a reason that does not exist;
(e)  indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction has been supplied in
accordance with a previous representation, if it has not;
(f)  indicates that the subject of a consumer transaction will be supplied in
greater quantity than the supplier intends;
(g)  indicates that replacement or repair is needed, if it is not;
(h)  indicates that a specific price advantage exists, if it does not;
(i)  indicates that the supplier has a sponsorship, approval, or affiliation
the supplier does not have;
(j) (i)  indicates that a consumer transaction involves or does not involve a
warranty, a disclaimer of warranties, particular warranty terms, or other
rights, remedies, or obligations, if the representation is false; or
(ii)  fails to honor a warranty or a particular warranty term;
(k)  indicates that the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other
benefit as an inducement for entering into a consumer transaction in return
for giving the supplier the names of prospective consumers or otherwise
helping the supplier to enter into other consumer transactions, if receipt of
the benefit is contingent on an event occurring after the consumer enters into
the transaction;
(l)  after receipt of payment for goods or services, fails to ship the goods
or furnish the services within the time advertised or otherwise represented
or, if no specific time is advertised or represented, fails to ship the goods
or furnish the services within 30 days, unless within the applicable time
period the supplier provides the buyer with the option to:
(i)  cancel the sales agreement and receive a refund of all previous payments
to the supplier if the refund is mailed or delivered to the buyer within ten
business days after the day on which the seller receives written notification
from the buyer of the buyer's intent to cancel the sales agreement and receive
the refund; or
(ii)  extend the shipping date to a specific date proposed by the supplier;
(m)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), fails to furnish a notice
meeting the requirements of Subsection (3)(a) of the purchaser's right to
cancel a direct solicitation sale within three business days of the time of
purchase if:
(i)  the sale is made other than at the supplier's established place of
business pursuant to the supplier's personal contact, whether through mail,
electronic mail, facsimile transmission, telephone, or any other form of
direct solicitation; and
(ii)  the sale price exceeds $25;
(n)  promotes, offers, or grants participation in a pyramid scheme as defined
under Title 76, Chapter 6a, Pyramid Scheme Act;
(o)  represents that the funds or property conveyed in response to a
charitable solicitation will be donated or used for a particular purpose or
will be donated to or used by a particular organization, if the representation
is false;
(p)  if a consumer indicates the consumer's intention of making a claim for a
motor vehicle repair against the consumer's  motor vehicle insurance policy:
(i)  commences the repair without first giving the consumer oral and written
notice of:
(A)  the total estimated cost of the repair; and
(B)  the total dollar amount the consumer is responsible to pay for the
repair, which dollar amount may not exceed the applicable deductible or other
copay arrangement in the consumer's insurance policy; or
(ii)  requests or collects from a consumer an amount that exceeds the dollar
amount a consumer was initially told the consumer was responsible to pay as an
insurance deductible or other copay arrangement for a motor vehicle repair
under Subsection (2)(p)(i), even if that amount is less than the full amount
the motor vehicle insurance policy requires the insured to pay as a deductible
or other copay arrangement, unless:
(A)  the consumer's insurance company denies that coverage exists for the
repair, in which case, the full amount of the repair may be charged and
collected from the consumer; or
(B)  the consumer misstates, before the repair is commenced, the amount of
money the insurance policy requires the consumer to pay as a deductible or
other copay arrangement, in which case, the supplier may charge and collect
from the consumer an amount that does not exceed the amount the insurance
policy requires the consumer to pay as a deductible or other copay
arrangement;
(q)  includes in any contract, receipt, or other written documentation of a
consumer transaction, or any addendum to any contract, receipt, or other
written documentation of a consumer transaction, any confession of judgment or
any waiver of any of the rights to which a consumer is entitled under this
chapter;
(r)  charges a consumer for a consumer transaction that has not previously
been agreed to by the consumer;
(s)  solicits or enters into a consumer transaction with a person who lacks
the mental ability to comprehend the nature and consequences of:
(i)  the consumer transaction; or
(ii)  the person's ability to benefit from the consumer transaction;
(t)  solicits for the sale of a product or service by providing a consumer
with an unsolicited check or negotiable instrument the presentment or
negotiation of which obligates the consumer to purchase a product or service,
unless the supplier is:
(i)  a depository institution under Section 7-1-103;
(ii)  an affiliate of a depository institution; or
(iii)  an entity regulated under Title 7, Financial Institutions Act;
(u)  sends an unsolicited mailing to a person that appears to be a billing,
statement, or request for payment for a product or service the person has not
ordered or used, or that implies that the mailing requests payment for an
ongoing product or service the person has not received or requested;
(v)  issues a gift certificate, instrument, or other record in exchange for
payment to provide the bearer, upon presentation, goods or services in a
specified amount without printing in a readable manner on the gift
certificate, instrument, packaging, or record any expiration date or
information concerning a fee to be charged and deducted from the balance of
the gift certificate, instrument, or other record; or
(w)  misrepresents the geographical origin or location of the supplier's
business in connection with the sale of cut flowers, flower arrangements, or
floral products.
(3) (a)  The notice required by Subsection (2)(m) shall:
(i)  be a conspicuous statement written in dark bold with at least 12 point
type on the first page of the purchase documentation; and
(ii)  read as follows: "YOU, THE BUYER, MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT AT ANY TIME
PRIOR TO MIDNIGHT OF THE THIRD BUSINESS DAY (or time period reflecting the
supplier's cancellation policy but not less than three business days) AFTER
THE DATE OF THE TRANSACTION OR RECEIPT OF THE PRODUCT, WHICHEVER IS LATER".
(b)  A supplier is exempt from the requirements of Subsection (2)(m) if the
supplier's cancellation policy:
(i)  is communicated to the buyer; and
(ii)  offers greater rights to the buyer than Subsection (2)(m).
(4) (a)  A gift certificate, instrument, or other record that does not print
an expiration date in accordance with Subsection (2)(v) does not expire.
(b)  A gift certificate, instrument, or other record that does not include
printed information concerning a fee to be charged and deducted from the
balance of the gift certificate, instrument, or other record is not subject to
the charging and deduction of the fee.
(c)  Subsections (2)(v) and (4)(b) do not apply to a gift certificate,
instrument, or other record useable at multiple, unaffiliated sellers of goods
or services if an expiration date is printed on the gift certificate,
instrument, or other record.
